Utah statutes.
34A-7-102.   Standards for construction and design -- Special approved
designs -- Maintenance requirements.
(1)  For the purposes of this part, the standards for the design and
construction of a new boiler and new pressure vessel shall be the latest
applicable provisions of the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code published by the
American Society of Mechanical Engineers.
(2)  This part shall not be construed as preventing the construction and use
of a boiler or pressure vessel of special design:
(a)  subject to approval of the Division of Boiler and Elevator Safety; and
(b)  if the special design provides a level of safety equivalent to that
contemplated by the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code of the American Society of
Mechanical Engineers.
(3) A boiler and pressure vessel, including an existing boiler and pressure
vessel, shall be maintained in safe operating condition for the service
involved.
